Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
GENERAL DEFINITIONS

§431:1-201 Insurance defined. (a)
Insurance is a contract whereby one undertakes to indemnify another or pay a
specified amount upon determinable contingencies.

(b) The following contracts are not considered
to be insurance for the purposes of this code:

(1) A bond with respect to which no premium is
charged or paid;

(2) A bond or contract or undertaking in the
performance of which the surety has an interest other than that of surety;

(3) A plan or agreement between an employer and any
employee or the employee's representative, individually or collectively, by the
terms of which the employer or the parties to the plan or agreement agree to
contribute to the cost of nonoccupational disability benefits, medical attention,
treatment or hospitalization for the employee or members of the employee's
family unless such plan is underwritten by an insurer as defined in this
article;

(4) A legal service plan as defined in chapter 488
other than plans in which either the person or entity offering the plan or the
person administering the plan is otherwise subject to this code;

(5) Any unincorporated interindemnity or reciprocal
or interinsurance contract, which qualifies under chapter 435E between members
of a cooperative corporation, whose members consist only of physicians and
surgeons licensed in Hawaii, which contracts indemnify solely in respect to
medical malpractice claims against such members, and which do not collect in
advance of loss any moneys other than contributions by each member to a
collective reserve trust fund or for necessary expenses of administration. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 34, §22]

Case Notes

Materialman guaranteeing general contractor's performance
through surety bond did not have an interest in the performance of the bond
other than that of surety. 797 F. Supp. 832.

When the uncontested requirements of the managed care plan
request for proposals were read alongside the text of subsection (a) defining
the term "insurance", it was clear that the insurers had agreed to
assume a risk based on a relationship with plan members--not the department of
human services--and were "undertaking to indemnify another or pay a
specified amount upon determinable contingencies"; thus, insurers were not
performing their plan contracts under no licensing authority but held licenses
pursuant to article 431:10A and were contracted to provide insurance services
for plan members. 126 H. 326, 271 P.3d 621 (2012).

Vehicle theft registration system sold by car dealership did
not constitute "insurance" where the system warranted against the
"defect" that the system would fail to deter a theft and fail to aid
in the recovery of the owner's vehicle, and did not warrant against the
fortuitous happening of the theft itself. 122 H. 181 (App.), 223 P.3d 246
(2009).

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next